North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-36 Agricultural Development Act [Repealed]

4-36-01.
Declaration of intent. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-02.
Legislative findings — Need for agricultural loan financing — How accomplished. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-03.
Terms defined. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 4; 1985, ch. 105, § 1; 1985, ch. 136, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-04.
Commission — Powers enumerated. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 5; 1985, ch. 136, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-05.
Commission — Duties enumerated. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-06.
Commission — Loans to lenders — Conditions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 7; 1985, ch. 136, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-07.
Commission — Invest in, purchase, or assign loans — Conditions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 8; 1985, ch. 136, § 11; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-08.
Commission — Lender’s requirements. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 9; 1985, ch. 136, § 12; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-09.
Commission — Optional requirements enumerated. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-10.
Commission — Borrow money and issue bonds — Purposes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 11; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-11.
Commission — Issue bonds to renew, pay, or refund bonds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 12; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-12.
Commission — Bond issuance — Special obligations — How paid and secured. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 13; 1985, ch. 136, § 13; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-13.
Commission — Bond issuance — State or political subdivision — No obligation — Statement. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 14; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-14.
Bonds authorized by resolution — Contents — Manner of sale. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 15; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-15.
Bond issuance — Resolution provisions enumerated. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 16; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-16.
Commission — Pledge — Effect — Lien — Recording not required. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 17; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-17.
Commission — Purchase bonds of commission canceled — Price. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 18; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-18.
Bonds secured by trust indenture — Contents — Expenses how treated. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 19; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-19.
Bonds — Negotiable instruments. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 20; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-20.
Bonds — Signatures of prior members or officers — Validity. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 21; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-21.
Commission — Execute bonds — Members not subject to personal liability. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 22; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-22.
Funds created. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 23; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-22.1.
Reserve fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 136, § 16; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-23.
Bondholders — Pledge — Agreement of the state. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 24; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-24.
Bank of North Dakota — Authorization to exercise administrative powers — Payment of commission expenses — Reimbursement — Liability of state or political subdivision. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 25; 1985, ch. 136, § 14; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-25.
Commission — Bonds exempt from taxation — Exception. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 26; 1985, ch. 136, § 15; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-26.
Bonds — Legal investments — Considered securities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 27; 1983, ch. 319, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-36-27.
Chapter — How construed. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 28; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.